Utah statutes.
61-2b-30.5.   Reinstatement of license, certification, registration,
approval -- Expert witness -- Trainee.
(1)  An individual whose license, certification, registration, or approval is
revoked under this chapter:
(a)  may not apply for renewal of that license, certification, registration,
or approval; and
(b)  may apply for licensure, certification, registration, or approval as
prescribed for an original license, certification, registration, or approval
subject to the limitations in Subsection (2).
(2)  An applicant for licensure, certification, registration, or approval as
an expert witness under Subsection (1):
(a)  may not apply for licensure, certification, registration, or approval
until at least five years after the date of revocation of the applicant's
original license, certification, registration, or approval; and
(b)  is not entitled to credit for experience gained prior to the date of
revocation in determining whether the applicant meets the experience
requirement for licensure, certification, registration, or approval.
(3)  A person whose license or certification is revoked may not act as a
trainee until at least four years after the day on which the person's license
or certification is revoked.
